Wisconsin, session 2025, SB11.
do enact as follows:SB11,14Section 1. 118.065 of the statutes is created to read:SB11,2,21118.065 Federally chartered youth membership organizations. (1) In 2this section:SB11,2,43(a) “School” means a public school, including a charter school authorized 4under s. 118.40 (2r) or (2x).SB11,2,75(b) “Youth membership organization” means an organization identified in 6chapter 301, 309, 311, 709, or 803 of title 36 of the U.S. Code that has an 7educational purpose and that promotes civic involvement.SB11,2,158(2) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, at the beginning of a school term, a 9youth membership organization may request that the principal of a school allow 10representatives of the youth membership organization to provide oral information 11or written information, or both, regarding the youth membership organization to 12pupils during a school day on school property, including information about how the 13youth membership organization furthers the educational interests and civic 14involvement of pupils consistent with good citizenship, for the purpose of 15encouraging pupils to join the youth membership organization.SB11,2,2016(3) If a youth membership organization submits a request under sub. (2) to 17the principal of a school, the principal shall schedule at least one date and time, 18which may be noninstructional time as determined by the principal, during the 19beginning of the school term for representatives of the youth membership 20organization to provide information as described under sub. (2).SB11,221Section 2. 119.04 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB11,3,1222119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 2366.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 1115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.38 (2), 115.415, 2115.445, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06, 118.07, 118.075, to 118.076, 118.10, 3118.12, 118.124, 118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 118.162, 4118.163, 118.164, 118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 118.24 (1), (2) 5(c) to (f), (6), (8), and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.258, 118.291, 118.292, 6118.293, 118.2935, 118.30 to 118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 118.53, 118.55, 7118.56, 118.58, 120.12 (2m), (4m), (5), and (15) to (27), 120.125, 120.13 (1), (2) (b) to 8(g), (3), (14), (17) to (19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 120.137, 120.14, 9120.20, 120.21 (3), and 120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city school district and 10board but not, unless explicitly provided in this chapter or in the terms of a 11contract, to the commissioner or to any school transferred to an opportunity schools 12and partnership program.SB11,3,1313